Massachusetts, session 194th, H2556.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 45 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 26. (a) Each municipality shall provide and maintain at least 1 automated external 
defibrillator, AED, at each athletic field, park and playground that is maintained by the 
municipality. The parks and recreation department of a municipality may, at its discretion, 
require additional AEDs be provided and maintained by the municipality at any athletic field, 
park or playground that is maintained by the municipality. 
(b) Any municipality that is required to provide and maintain an AED pursuant to 
subsection (a) shall provide mandatory training on cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of 

of 3 10 AEDs to: all staff employed by its parks and recreation department; all sports coaches, umpires, 
referees and other sports officials who participate in athletic events held at athletic fields, parks 
or playgrounds maintained by the municipality; and any other group as determined by the parks 
and recreation department of the municipality. 
(c) The parks and recreation department of each municipality subject to this section may 
contract on behalf of the municipality for the procurement of AEDs and the mandatory training 
on cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of AEDs required by subsection (b). 
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
54C and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 54C. (a) Each school district, vocational district, charter school, approved private 
day or residential school and collaborative school shall provide and maintain at least 1 automated 
external defibrillator, AED, on site at each school facility where instruction is provided. Each 
school shall have on staff a person who is an AED provider having current certification in a 
training course in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and in the use of an AED in accordance with 
the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American National Red 
Cross. 
(b) Each school district, vocational district, charter school, approved private day or 
residential school and collaborative school that maintains athletic fields for use in school-
sponsored athletic events shall provide and maintain at least 1 AED in the area of the athletic 
fields. The school administration shall ensure that an AED provider is readily available at any 
school-sponsored athletic event. 

of 3 31  (c) Any school system that is required to provide and maintain an AED pursuant to 
subsections (a) and (b) shall provide mandatory training on cardiopulmonary resuscitation and 
the use of AEDs to all staff employed by the school system, including sports coaches. 
(d) If a school system is unable to comply with the requirements of this section, the 
superintendent of the school district, the administration of a private day or residential school or 
the board of trustees of a charter school, shall request a hardship waiver from the department of 
elementary and secondary education. The department of elementary and secondary education, in 
consultation with the department of public health, shall make available to public schools a list of 
grants and other funding sources that a public school may access to facilitate the purchase of 
AEDs. 
(e) Any school staff member who, in good faith, attempts to render emergency care, 
including cardiopulmonary resuscitation or defibrillation, and does so without compensation, 
shall not be liable 
for acts or omissions, other than gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, 
resulting from the attempt to render such emergency care. 
(f) The department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with the 
department of public health, shall establish regulations and guidelines for the implementation, 
training, support and supervision of this section.